Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.33.075

Budget adoption.

Following conclusion of the hearing, and prior to the beginning of the fiscal year, the legislative body shall make such adjustments and changes as it deems necessary or proper and after determining the allowance in each item, department, classification and fund, and shall by ordinance, adopt the budget in its final form and content. Appropriations shall be limited to the total estimated revenues contained therein including the amount to be raised by ad valorem taxes and the unencumbered fund balances estimated to be available at the close of the current fiscal year. Such ordinances may adopt the final budget by reference: PROVIDED, That the ordinance adopting such budget shall set forth in summary form the totals of estimated revenues and appropriations for each separate fund and the aggregate totals for all such funds combined.

A complete copy of the final budget as adopted shall be transmitted to the state auditor, and to the association of Washington cities.

[ 1995 c 301 s 53; 1969 ex.s. c 81 s 3; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.33.075.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 81: See note following RCW 35A.13.035.